Indiana, session 2026, SB73.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-31.5-2-195.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 195.5. "Mask", for purposes of
IC 35-45-1, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-45-1-1.
SECTION 2. IC 35-31.5-2-256.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 256.7. "Public assembly", for
purposes of IC 35-45-1, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-45-1-1.
SECTION 3. IC 35-45-1-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) As used in The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(b) "Mask" means a covering that obscures or is worn over a
person's nose or mouth. However, the term does not include the
following:
(1) A holiday costume, if worn to celebrate the holiday.
(2) A theater costume worn by a person participating in a
theater production.
2026 IN 73—LS 6394/DI 106


(3) A covering worn for religious purposes.
(4) A covering worn for the purposes of occupational safety.
(5) A medical device, if:
(A) prescribed by a physician; or
(B) worn in a health care facility.
(6) A helmet or similar protective device, if worn by a person
operating or riding on a motorcycle, bicycle, scooter, roller
skates, or similar device.
(7) Athletic equipment, if worn by a person participating in an
athletic contest.
(8) Equipment worn by an emergency medical services
provider (as defined by IC 16-41-10-1) while acting within the
scope of the provider's professional responsibilities.
(9) Equipment or a face covering worn by a law enforcement
officer acting within the scope of the officer's employment.
(c) "Public assembly" means a gathering:
(1) of at least ten (10) persons; and
(2) that occurs in a public place or in a place to which the
general public is invited or permitted to enter.
(d) "Tumultuous conduct" means conduct that results in, or is likely
to result in, serious bodily injury to a person or substantial damage to
property.
(e) "Unlawful assembly" means an assembly of five (5) or more
persons whose common object is to commit an unlawful act, or a lawful
act by unlawful means. Prior concert is not necessary to form an
unlawful assembly.
SECTION 4. IC 35-45-1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.94-2021,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. A person who, being a member of an unlawful
assembly, recklessly, knowingly, or intentionally engages in
tumultuous conduct commits rioting, a Class A misdemeanor.
However, the offense is:
(1) a Level 6 felony if it:
(A) is committed while armed with a deadly weapon;
(B) results in serious bodily injury; or
(C) causes property damage of at least seven hundred fifty
dollars ($750) and less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000);
or
(D) is committed by a person wearing a mask; and
(2) a Level 5 felony if it:
(A) results in catastrophic injury or death; or
(B) causes property damage of at least fifty thousand dollars
2026 IN 73—LS 6394/DI 106


($50,000).
SECTION 5. IC 35-45-1-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.158-2013,
SECTION 522, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A person who recklessly,
knowingly, or intentionally:
(1) engages in fighting or in tumultuous conduct;
(2) makes unreasonable noise and continues to do so after being
asked to stop; or
(3) disrupts a lawful assembly of persons;
commits disorderly conduct, a Class B misdemeanor.
(b) The offense described in subsection (a) is a Level 6 felony if it:
(1) adversely affects airport security; and
(2) is committed in an airport (as defined in IC 8-21-1-1) or on the
premises of an airport, including in a parking area, a maintenance
bay, or an aircraft hangar.
(c) The offense described in subsection (a) is a Level 6 felony if it:
(1) is committed within five hundred (500) feet of:
(A) the location where a burial is being performed;
(B) a funeral procession, if the person described in subsection
(a) knows that the funeral procession is taking place; or
(C) a building in which:
(i) a funeral or memorial service; or
(ii) the viewing of a deceased person;
is being conducted; and
(2) adversely affects the funeral, burial, viewing, funeral
procession, or memorial service.
(d) The offense described in subsection (a) is a Level 6 felony if
it is committed by a person wearing a mask.
SECTION 6. IC 35-45-1-6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) A person who, with the intent to conceal the
person's identity, wears a mask while present at a public assembly
commits unlawful masking, a Class C misdemeanor. However, the
offense is a Class A misdemeanor if the person has a prior
unrelated conviction under this section.
(b) It is a defense to a prosecution under this section that the:
(1) public assembly takes place on private property;
(2) public assembly is held with the permission of the owner,
manager, or other person having lawful control of, or a
contractual interest in, the property; and
(3) owner, manager, or other person having lawful control of,
or a contractual interest in, the property has granted
2026 IN 73—LS 6394/DI 106


permission to participants in the public assembly to wear
masks.
2026 IN 73—LS 6394/DI 106